Hawaii statutes.
[§141-32] Industrial
hemp pilot program; established. (a) There is established within the
department of agriculture an industrial hemp pilot program to allow the
cultivation of industrial hemp and distribution of its seed in Hawaii through a
pilot program for purposes of agricultural or academic research. The
industrial hemp pilot program may be conducted on multiple test sites.

(b) In order to acquire industrial hemp seed
for the pilot program, the department of agriculture shall register with the United
States Department of Justice, Drug Enforcement Administration, as an importer
of controlled substances.

(c) The pilot program shall establish an
agency relationship with licensees, who operate as extensions of the board for
the purposes of research on the growth, cultivation, and marketing of
industrial hemp.

(d) The board shall make a reasonable effort
to:

(1) Inform licensees of the laws and regulations
applicable to the production of industrial hemp;

(2) Act as a resource for licensees on regulatory
questions regarding the industrial hemp pilot program; provided that the board
shall not provide licensees with legal advice;

(3) Provide licensees with industrial hemp seed, upon
licensees' request and at licensees' expense, in a quantity and variety
determined at the discretion of the board; and

(4) Catalog data received, in cooperation with the
licensee, other program participants, and institutions of higher education in
the State, for improved methods and techniques in growing, cultivating, and
marketing industrial hemp. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next